Nebraska, session 109, LB311.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Sections 1 to 11 of this act shall be known and may be cited
as the Telecommunications Exchange Deregulation Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Telecommunications Exchange Deregulation Act:
(1) Carrier of last resort means a facilities-based telecommunications
company, as determined by the commission, not inconsistent with the federal
Telecommunications Act of 1996, which receives or has received high-cost
support from the federal Universal Service Fund or the Nebraska
Telecommunications Universal Service Fund and has the obligation to provide
voice communications service, upon reasonable request, to all residential and
single-line business customers within a defined service or geographic area;
(2) Commission means the Public Service Commission;
(3) Deregulated carrier means an electing local exchange carrier for which
all of such carrier's markets have been deregulated;
(4) Electing local exchange carrier means a telecommunications company
holding a certificate to offer local exchange telecommunications services
within Nebraska issued on or before February 8, 1996, or a carrier that has
received a certificate in conjunction with the acquisition of a certificate
issued on or before February 8, 1996;
(5) Transitioning carrier means an electing local exchange carrier for
which at least one, but not all, of such carrier's exchanges has been
deregulated; and
(6) Voice communications service means (a) the transmission, conveyance,
or routing of real-time, two-way voice communications to a point or between or
among points by or through any electronic, radio, satellite, cable, optical,
microwave, wireline, wireless, or other medium or method, regardless of the
protocol used, (b) the ability to receive and terminate voice calls to and from
the public switched telephone network, or (c) voice over Internet protocol
service as defined in section 86-121.01.
Sec. 3. (1) The commission may require disclosure of information from
telecommunications carriers as necessary to implement and enforce the
Telecommunications Exchange Deregulation Act.
(2) The commission may maintain the confidentiality of any information
collected under the Telecommunications Exchange Deregulation Act that is
claimed to be confidential for containing proprietary or commercial information
and withhold such information from public disclosure pursuant to subdivision
(3) of section 84-712.05.
(3) The Telecommunications Exchange Deregulation Act shall not affect or
modify:
(a) The enforcement of criminal or civil laws, including, but not limited
to, laws concerning consumer protection and unfair or deceptive trade practices
which apply generally to the conduct of business;
(b) Any entity's obligations or rights or commission authority under
section 86-122 and under 47 U.S.C. 251 and 252, as such sections existed on
January 1, 2019, and any carrier-to-carrier tariff rates, wholesale service
quality standards, interconnection agreements, or other obligations for which
the commission has jurisdiction under state or federal law;
(c) Any requirement to contribute to any fund administered by the
commission authorized by the 911 Service System Act, the Telecommunications
Relay System Act, or the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund
Act;
(d) Any commission jurisdiction over intrastate switched access rates,
-1-

LB311 LB311
2025 2025
terms, and conditions, including the resolution of disputes arising from, and
implementation of federal and state law with respect to, intercarrier
compensation;
(e) The eligibility and requirements for the receipt of funds from the
Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund and the rules, regulations,
and orders under the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund Act or
the receipt of funds from the federal Universal Service Fund, regardless of the
unregulated status of the provider's service under the Telecommunications
Exchange Deregulation Act;
(f) Any entity's rights and obligations with respect to (i) registration
under section 86-125, (ii) the use of public streets, roads, highways, and
rights-of-way, or (iii) a certificate of public convenience and necessity or a
permit;
(g) The commission's authority under the 911 Service System Act or the
Telecommunications Relay System Act;
(h) Any provision of the Rural Communications Sustainability Act; and
(i) The commission's authority to apply or enforce statutory or regulatory
provisions against an incumbent local exchange carrier in a deregulated
exchange if such statutory or regulatory provisions could otherwise be
applicable to a competitive local exchange carrier.
Sec. 4. (1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of Chapters 75 and 86,
only an electing local exchange carrier may initiate a proceeding to deregulate
one of such carrier's exchanges. The commission may hold a hearing on the
application and receive testimony from the applicant and any other interested
person. No later than one hundred twenty days after the date the commission
receives an application to initiate such proceeding, the commission shall
determine whether the regulated exchange should be deregulated or remain
regulated and issue a final order classifying the exchange in accordance with
this section. An electing local exchange carrier may file an application with
the commission to deregulate an exchange of the carrier that the commission
previously determined should remain regulated upon a material change in the
exchange including the entrance of additional carriers providing voice
communications service by carriers previously operating in the exchange. The
commission may set an application fee at an amount to cover the commission's
cost of processing such application.
(2)(a) In making a determination under subsection (1) of this section, the
commission shall presume that an exchange is competitive and that deregulation
of the exchange is in the public interest if, in addition to the electing local
exchange carrier, there are at least two other carriers, including one wireline
or cable carrier, providing voice communications service in at least ninety
percent of the household locations outside of tribal areas known at the time of
application in the exchange. The presumption may be rebutted by evidence
sufficient to determine that:
(i) More than ten percent of the household locations outside of tribal
areas known at the time of application in the exchange do not have, in addition
to the electing local exchange carrier, at least two other carriers, including
one wireline or cable carrier, providing voice communications service; or
(ii) Household locations outside of tribal areas known at the time of
application in the exchange have no carrier other than the electing local
exchange carrier capable of providing voice communications service to locations
known at the time of application. For purposes of this subdivision (2)(a)(ii),
voice communications shall not include the transmission, conveyance, or routing
of real-time, two-way voice communications to a point or between or among
points by or through satellite.
(b) In making a determination under subsection (1) of this section, the
commission may determine that an exchange should be deregulated if, in addition
to the electing local exchange carrier, at least two other carriers are
providing, or are capable of providing, voice communications service in at
least seventy-five percent of the household locations outside of tribal areas
known at the time of application in the exchange.
(c) In determining whether household locations are capable of being
provided voice communications services by a carrier other than the electing
local exchange carrier, the commission shall consider evidence related to
vacant locations, declination of service to the location, and other evidence
related to inaccuracies in the Federal Communications Commission's Broadband
Data Collection or other data related to service capability for the location.
(d) For the purposes of this subsection, an electing local exchange
carrier may rely on data available to the carrier regarding the voice
communications service capability, including, but not limited to, data from the
Federal Communications Commission's Broadband Data Collection that is available
at the time of the application.
(e) If the commission deregulates an exchange under this section and the
deregulation results in a regulated carrier no longer regulated or a
transitioning carrier no longer meeting the definition of a transitioning
carrier, the commission shall issue an order reclassifying such carrier as a
deregulated carrier.
Sec. 5. (1) A deregulated carrier is not required to:
(a) Fulfill the obligations of a carrier of last resort;
(b) Comply with standards or reporting requirements related to quality of
retail service;
(c) Comply with restrictions on rates for retail telecommunications
services, including advanced telecommunications services, unless the
restrictions are a condition of receiving grant funds administered by the
-2-

LB311 LB311
2025 2025
commission or imposed for compliance with sections 86-139 to 86-157; or
(d) File an earnings report with the commission.
(2) The commission shall not provide a deregulated carrier with any funds
from the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provisions of Chapter 86, the commission
shall have only the authority over a deregulated carrier provided under the
Telecommunications Exchange Deregulation Act. If there is a conflict between
the Telecommunications Exchange Deregulation Act and the other applicable
provisions of Chapter 86, the Telecommunications Exchange Deregulation Act
shall control.
(4) Nothing in this section affects the continuing applicability of
sections 86-122 to 86-124.
(5) The commission may receive, mediate, and hear complaints filed by any
retail or wholesale customers against a deregulated carrier that are in the
scope of the commission's authority provided under Chapter 86.
(6) A telecommunications company or communications provider shall not be
required to fulfill the obligations of a carrier of last resort in an exchange
that has been deregulated, unless such telecommunications company or
communications provider consents to fulfilling such obligations.
Sec. 6. Except as provided by section 7 of this act, a transitioning
carrier is governed by the Telecommunications Exchange Deregulation Act and the
provisions of Chapters 75 and 86 that applied to the carrier immediately before
the date the carrier was classified as a transitioning carrier. If there is a
conflict between the Telecommunications Exchange Deregulation Act and other
applicable provisions of Chapter 86, the Telecommunications Exchange
Deregulation Act shall control.
Sec. 7. (1) A transitioning carrier is no longer required to do the
following in the deregulated exchange:
(a) Fulfill the obligations of a carrier of last resort;
(b) Comply with standards or reporting requirements related to quality of
retail service; or
(c) Comply with a pricing requirement for retail service unless the
requirement is a condition of receiving grant funds administered by the
commission.
(2) A transitioning carrier is not eligible to receive funds from the
Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund for deregulated exchanges
and the commission shall, to the extent feasible in the funding formula, reduce
a transitioning carrier's allocation of funds from the Nebraska
Telecommunications Universal Service Fund to account for deregulated exchanges.
Sec. 8. In an exchange that remains regulated, a transitioning carrier
shall price the carrier's retail services in accordance with the provisions
that applied to that carrier immediately before the date the carrier was
classified by the commission as a transitioning carrier.
Sec. 9. Nothing in the Telecommunications Exchange Deregulation Act shall
relieve a telecommunications or communications provider from the requirements
in section 86-124.
Sec. 10. A telecommunications company seeking to discontinue service in a
deregulated exchange shall be exempt from subdivision (1)(a) of section 86-134.
A telecommunications company seeking to discontinue service in a deregulated
exchange shall be solely subject to subdivision (1)(b) of section 86-134.
Sec. 11. The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
and conduct any proceedings necessary to administer and enforce the
Telecommunications Exchange Deregulation Act, including rules and regulations
to determine whether an exchange should remain regulated, be deregulated, or be
reregulated.
Sec. 12. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Action means any law, rule, regulation, ordinance, resolution, or
similar action by a governing entity;
(b) Governing entity means (i) a state agency acting in any capacity and
(ii) an agency, municipality, county, member of the public power industry, or
other political subdivision that has jurisdiction over any portion of a public
right-of-way or infrastructure;
(c) Infrastructure means any land, easements, conduits, poles, towers,
structures, and related facilities owned and managed by a governing entity;
(d) Internet-protocol-enabled service has the same meaning as in section
86-111.01;
(e) Provider means a provider of telecommunications service or Internet-
protocol-enabled service;
(f) Public power industry has the same meaning as in section 70-601;
(g) Public right-of-way means any right-of-way located in a highway as
defined in section 60-624;
(h) Telecommunications company has the same meaning as in section 86-119;
(i) Telecommunications service has the same meaning as in section 86-121;
and
(j) Voice over Internet protocol service has the same meaning as in
section 86-121.01.
(2) No governing entity shall enact, adopt, or enforce any action the
effect of which would be to:
(a) Impose any regulation barred by subdivision (1)(d) of section 86-124,
including by conditioning any contract or grant upon acceptance of conditions
constituting such regulation with respect to any service not offered under such
contract or grant;
(b) Impose any regulation on a provider that is preempted by federal law
-3-

LB311 LB311
2025 2025
or on a telecommunications company that is prohibited by subsection (3) of
section 86-123; or
(c) Condition access to infrastructure or a public right-of-way upon any
regulation of or acceptance of conditions regulating telecommunications
service, Internet-protocol-enabled service, voice over Internet protocol
service, rates, service, or service contract terms or conditions or by
providing requirements inconsistent with section 86-704.
(3) This section shall not affect or modify:
(a) Any matter excluded from the scope of section 86-124 by subsection (2)
thereof;
(b) Any entity's rights, privileges, duties, and obligations with respect
to the use of a public right-of-way or infrastructure;
(c) The authority of the Public Service Commission under the 911 Service
System Act;
(d) Any authority delegated to the Public Service Commission or to any
state agency to administer a state or federal grant program under a state or
federal statute, rule, or order;
(e) The authority of a governing entity to enter into agreements or
contracts not in conflict with subsection (2) of this section; or
(f) Any agreement, contract, or rights to rent or lease conduit from a
conduit system owned and managed by a city of the primary class or a county
containing a city of the primary class, provided that such conduit system was
constructed and had at least one tenant before the operative date of this
section, including any conduit system repairs or relocations subsequent to the
operative date of this section.
Sec. 13. Section 75-109.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
75-109.01 Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, the Public
Service Commission shall have jurisdiction, as prescribed, over the following
subjects:
(1) Common carriers, generally, pursuant to sections 75-101 to 75-158;
(2) Grain pursuant to the Grain Dealer Act and the Grain Warehouse Act and
sections 89-1,104 to 89-1,108;
(3) Manufactured homes and recreational vehicles pursuant to the Uniform
Standard Code for Manufactured Homes and Recreational Vehicles;
(4) Modular housing units pursuant to the Nebraska Uniform Standards for
Modular Housing Units Act;
(5) Motor carrier registration, licensure, and safety pursuant to sections
75-301 to 75-343, 75-369.03, 75-370, and 75-371;
(6) Pipeline carriers and rights-of-way pursuant to the Major Oil Pipeline
Siting Act, the State Natural Gas Regulation Act, and sections 75-501 to
75-503. If the provisions of Chapter 75 are inconsistent with the provisions of
the Major Oil Pipeline Siting Act, the provisions of the Major Oil Pipeline
Siting Act control;
(7) Railroad carrier safety pursuant to sections 74-918, 74-919, 74-1323,
and 75-401 to 75-430;
(8) Telecommunications carriers pursuant to the Automatic Dialing-
Announcing Devices Act, the Emergency Telephone Communications Systems Act, the
Enhanced Wireless 911 Services Act, the 911 Service System Act, the Intrastate
Pay-Per-Call Regulation Act, the Nebraska Telecommunications Regulation Act,
the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund Act, the
Telecommunications Exchange Deregulation Act, the Telecommunications Relay
System Act, the Telephone Consumer Slamming Prevention Act, and sections 86-574
to 86-578, 86-1031, 86-1307, and 86-1308;
(9) Transmission lines and rights-of-way pursuant to sections 70-301 and
75-702 to 75-724;
(10) Water service pursuant to the Water Service Regulation Act; and
(11) Jurisdictional utilities governed by the State Natural Gas Regulation
Act. If the provisions of Chapter 75 are inconsistent with the provisions of
the State Natural Gas Regulation Act, the provisions of the State Natural Gas
Regulation Act control.
Sec. 14. Section 75-311, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
75-311 (1)(a) (1) A certificate shall be issued to any qualified applicant
authorizing the whole or any part of the operations covered by the application
if it is found after notice and hearing that (i) (a) the applicant is fit,
willing, and able properly to perform the service proposed and to conform to
the provisions of sections 75-301 to 75-322 and the requirements, rules, and
regulations of the commission under such sections and (ii) (b) the proposed
service, to the extent to be authorized by the certificate, whether regular or
irregular, is or will be required by the present or future public convenience
and necessity. Otherwise the application shall be denied.
(b) The burden shall be on the applicant to show (i) that they are fit,
willing, and able properly to perform the service proposed and to conform to
the provisions of sections 75-301 to 75-322 and the requirements, rules, and
regulations of the commission and (ii) that the proposed service will be
responsive to a public demand or need.
(c) The burden shall be on any protestant to the application to show that
(i) existing carriers are currently meeting, or will meet, the proposed need
and (ii) that even if the applicant's service will be responsive to a public
demand or need, that applicant would not be able to serve this need in a
specified manner without endangering or impairing the operations of existing
carriers contrary to the public interest.
-4-

LB311 LB311
2025 2025
(2)(a) (2) A permit shall be issued to any qualified applicant therefor
authorizing in whole or in part the operations covered by the application if it
appears after notice and hearing from the application or from any hearing held
on the application that (i) (a) the applicant is fit, willing, and able
properly to perform the service of a contract carrier by motor vehicle and to
conform to the provisions of such sections and the lawful requirements, rules,
and regulations of the commission under such sections and (ii) (b) the proposed
operation, to the extent authorized by the permit, will be consistent with the
public interest by providing services designed to meet the distinct needs of
each individual customer or a specifically designated class of customers as
defined in subdivision (7) of section 75-302. Otherwise the application shall
be denied.
(b) For a designation of authority to provide medicaid nonemergency
medical transportation services pursuant to a contract with (i) the Department
of Health and Human Services, (ii) a medicaid-managed care organization under
contract with the department, or (iii) another agent working on the
department's behalf as provided under section 75-303.01, in determining whether
the authorization will be consistent with the public interest, the commission
shall consult with the Director of Medicaid and Long-Term Care of the Division
of Medicaid and Long-Term Care of the department or his or her designee.
(3)(a) (3) A designation of authority shall be issued to any regulated
motor carrier holding a certificate under subsection (1) of this section or a
permit under subsection (2) of this section authorizing such carrier to provide
medicaid nonemergency medical transportation services pursuant to a contract
with (i) the Department of Health and Human Services, (ii) a medicaid-managed
care organization under contract with the department, or (iii) another agent
working on the department's behalf as provided under section 75-303.01, if it
is found after notice and hearing from the application or from any hearing held
on the application that the authorization is or will be required by the present
or future convenience and necessity to serve the distinct needs of medicaid
clients.
(b) The burden shall be on the applicant to show that the proposed service
will be responsive to a public demand or need. The burden shall be on any
protestant to the application to show that (i) existing carriers are currently
meeting, or will meet, the proposed need and (ii) that even if the applicant's
service will be responsive to a public demand or need, that applicant would not
be able to serve this need in a specified manner without endangering or
impairing the operations of existing carriers contrary to the public interest.
(c) In determining whether the authorization is or will be required by the
present or future convenience and necessity to serve the distinct needs of
medicaid clients, the commission shall consult with the Director of Medicaid
and Long-Term Care of the Division of Medicaid and Long-Term Care of the
department or his or her designee.
(4) Until July 1, 2021, no person shall at the same time hold a
certificate as a common carrier and a permit as a contract carrier for
transportation of household goods by motor vehicles over the same route or
within the same territory unless the commission finds that it is consistent
with the public interest and with the policy declared in section 75-301.
(5) Until July 1, 2021, after the issuance of a certificate or permit, the
commission shall review the operations of all common or contract carriers who
hold authority from the commission to determine whether there are insufficient
operations in the transportation of household goods to justify the commission's
finding that such common or contract carrier has willfully failed to perform
transportation under sections 75-301 to 75-322 and rules and regulations
promulgated under such sections. If the commission determines that there are
insufficient operations, then the commission shall commence proceedings under
section 75-315 to revoke the certificate or permit involved.
(4) (6) This section shall not apply to transportation network companies
holding a permit under section 75-324 or operations pursuant to a contract
authorized by sections 75-303.02 and 75-303.03.
Sec. 15. Section 75-342, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
75-342 No transportation network company or participating driver shall
provide transportation for any person under contract with the Department of
Health and Human Services or any contractors of the Department of Health and
Human Services without specific authorization from the commission. The
commission shall grant specific authorization to a requesting transportation
network company or participating driver, unless a protestant shows that (1)
existing carriers are currently meeting, or will meet, the proposed need for
the proposed service and (2) that even if the applicant's service will be
responsive to a public demand or need, that applicant would not be able to
serve this need in a specified manner without endangering or impairing the
operations of existing carriers contrary to the public interest. In order to
receive such authorization, the transportation network company or participating
driver shall demonstrate that such service is or will be required by the
present or future public convenience and necessity.
Sec. 16. Section 76-2325.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
76-2325.01 Any person who willfully and maliciously breaks, injures,
destroys, or otherwise interferes with the poles, wires, or other facilities of
any telecommunications, broadband, communications, wireless infrastructure, or
railroad company or electric light and power company in this state or who
willfully and purposely interrupts or interferes with the transmission of
-5-

LB311 LB311
2025 2025
telecommunications, broadband, communications, messages or the transmission of
light, heat, or and power in this state shall be subject to the action and
penalty prescribed in section 28-519.
Sec. 17. Section 86-111.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
86-111.01 Internet-protocol-enabled service or IP-enabled service means
any service, capability, functionality, or application, including broadband
Internet access service as defined in 47 C.F.R. 8.1, as such regulation existed
on January 1, 2025, provided using Internet protocol, or any successor
protocol, that enables a service user to send or receive a communication in
Internet protocol format, including, but not limited to, voice, data, or video.
Sec. 18. Section 86-124, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-124 (1) The commission shall not regulate the following:
(a) One-way broadcast or cable television transmission of television or
radio signals;
(b) Mobile radio services, radio paging services, and wireless
telecommunications service;
(c) Interexchange services; and
(d) Internet-protocol-enabled service and voice over Internet protocol
service, including rates, service or contract terms, conditions, or
requirements for entry for such service.
(2) This section shall not affect or modify:
(a) The enforcement of criminal or civil laws, including, but not limited
to, laws concerning consumer protection and unfair or deceptive trade practices
which apply generally to the conduct of business;
(b)(i) Any entity's obligations or rights or commission authority under
section 86-122 and under 47 U.S.C. 251 and 252, as such sections existed on
January 1, 2019, and (ii) any carrier-to-carrier tariff rates, wholesale
service quality standards, interconnection agreements, or other obligations for
which the commission has jurisdiction under state or federal law;
(c) Any requirement to contribute to any fund administered by the
commission authorized by the Enhanced Wireless 911 Services Act or the Nebraska
Telecommunications Universal Service Fund Act;
(d) Any commission jurisdiction over intrastate switched access rates,
terms, and conditions, including the resolution of disputes arising from, and
implementation of federal and state law with respect to, intercarrier
compensation;
(e) The eligibility and requirements for the receipt of funds from the
Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund and the rules, regulations,
and orders under the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund Act or
the receipt of funds from the federal Universal Service Fund universal service
fund, regardless of the unregulated status of the provider's service under this
section;
(f) Any entity's rights and obligations with respect to (i) registration
under section 86-125, (ii) the use of public streets, roads, highways, and
rights-of-way, or (iii) a certificate of public convenience and necessity or a
permit; and
(g) The commission's authority under section 86-1029.04.
Sec. 19. Section 86-704, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-704 (1) Any telecommunications company, incorporated or qualified to do
business in this state, is granted the right to construct, operate, and
maintain telecommunications lines and related facilities along, upon, across,
and under the public highways of this state, and upon and under lands in this
state, whether state or privately owned, except that (a) such lines and related
facilities shall be so constructed and maintained as not to interfere with the
ordinary use of such lands or of such highways by the public and (b) all aerial
wires and cables shall be placed at a height of not less than eighteen feet
above all highway crossings.
(2) Sections 86-701 to 86-707 shall not transfer the rights now vested in
governing entities municipalities in relation to the regulation of the poles,
wires, cables, and other appliances or authorize a telecommunications company
to erect any poles or construct any conduit, cable, or other facilities along,
upon, across, or under a public highway within a municipality without first
obtaining the consent of the governing entity body of the municipality. The
governing entity municipality shall not exercise any authority over any rights
the telecommunications company may have to deliver telecommunications services
as authorized by the Public Service Commission or the Federal Communications
Commission and shall not impose any requirement or condition on Internet-
protocol-enabled service and voice over Internet protocol service, including
rates, service, or service contract terms or conditions.
(3) Consent from a governing entity body for the use of a public highway
within a municipality shall be based upon a lawful exercise of the governing
entity's its statutory and constitutional authority. Such consent shall not be
unreasonably withheld, and a preference or disadvantage shall not be created
through the granting or withholding of such consent. A governing entity
municipality shall not adopt an ordinance, resolution, rule, or regulation that
prohibits or has the effect of prohibiting the ability of a telecommunications
company to provide telecommunications service.
(4) (4)(a) A municipality shall not levy a tax, fee, or charge for any
right or privilege of engaging in a telecommunications business or for the use
by a telecommunications company of a public highway other than:
-6-

LB311 LB311
2025 2025
(a) (i) An occupation tax authorized under section 14-109, 15-202, 15-203,
16-205, or 17-525 that meets the following requirements:
(i) (A) The occupation tax shall be imposed only on the receipts from the
sale of telecommunications service as defined in subdivision (7)(aa) of section
77-2703.04; and
(ii) (B) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the
occupation tax shall not exceed:
(A) (I) Before October 1, 2024, six and twenty-five hundredths percent;
and
(B) (II) Beginning October 1, 2024, four percent; and
(b) (ii) A public highway construction permit fee or charge that complies
with subsection (7) of this section. to the extent that the fee or charge
applies to all persons seeking use of the public highway in a substantially
similar manner. All public highway construction permit fees or charges shall be
directly related to the costs incurred by the municipality in providing
services relating to the granting or administration of permits. Any highway
construction permit fee or charge shall also be reasonably related in time to
the occurrence of such costs.
(b) Any tax, fee, or charge imposed by a municipality shall be
competitively neutral.
(5) A municipality may increase an occupation tax described in subdivision
(4)(a) (4)(a)(i) of this section to a rate that exceeds the limit contained in
subdivision (4)(a)(ii) (4)(a)(i)(B) of this section if the question of whether
to increase such rate has been submitted at a primary or general election at
which members of the governing body of the municipality are nominated or
elected or at a special election held within the municipality and in which all
registered voters shall be entitled to vote on such question. A municipality
may not increase its existing rate pursuant to this subsection by more than
twenty-five hundredths percent at any one election. The officials of the
municipality shall order the submission of the question by submitting a
certified copy of the resolution proposing the rate increase to the election
commissioner or county clerk at least fifty days before the election. The
election shall be conducted in accordance with the Election Act. If a majority
of the votes cast upon such question are in favor of such rate increase, then
the governing body of such municipality shall be empowered to impose the rate
increase. If a majority of those voting on the question are opposed to such
rate increase, then the governing body of the municipality shall not impose
such rate increase.
(6) The changes made by Laws 1999, LB 496, shall not be construed to
affect the terms or conditions of any franchise, license, or permit issued by a
municipality prior to August 28, 1999, or to release any party from any
obligations thereunder. Such franchises, licenses, or permits shall remain
fully enforceable in accordance with their terms. A municipality may lawfully
enter into agreements with franchise holders, licensees, or permittees to
modify or terminate an existing franchise, license, or agreement.
(7) Any public highway construction permit fee or charge that is imposed
by a governing entity for the use of a public highway shall (a) apply to all
persons seeking use of the public highway in a substantially similar manner,
(b) be directly related to the costs incurred by the governing entity in
providing services relating to the granting or administration of permits, and
(c) be reasonably related in time to the occurrence of such costs.
(8) Any tax, fee, or charge imposed by a governing entity as described in
this section shall be competitively neutral.
(9) (7) Taxes or fees shall not be collected by a governing entity
municipality through the provision of in-kind services by a telecommunications
company, and a governing entity municipality shall not require the provision of
in-kind services as a condition of consent to the use of a public highway.
(10) (8) The terms of any agreement between a governing entity
municipality and a telecommunications company regarding use of public highways
shall be matters of public record and shall be made available to any member of
the public upon request, except that information submitted to a governing
entity municipality by a telecommunications company which such
telecommunications company determines to be proprietary shall be deemed to be a
trade secret pursuant to subdivision (3) of section 84-712.05 and shall be
accorded full protection from disclosure to third parties in a manner
consistent with state law.
(11) For purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(a) Governing entity has the same meaning as in section 12 of this act;
(b) Internet-protocol-enabled service has the same meaning as in section
86-111.01;
(c) Telecommunications service has the same meaning as in section 86-121;
and
(d) Voice over Internet protocol service has the same meaning as in
section 86-121.01.
Sec. 20. Section 86-1505, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
86-1505 After a granting agency makes final payment of public funds under
a broadband deployment program to a competitive provider in a deployment
project area that is part of a local exchange area served by an incumbent
carrier, upon request by the incumbent carrier or competitive provider the
commission expeditiously shall:
(1) Upon finding that the granting agency has determined the competitive
provider is in compliance with all requirements of the broadband deployment
-7-

LB311 LB311
2025 2025
program, relieve the incumbent carrier of eligible telecommunications carrier
obligations and carrier of last resort obligations in the deployment project
area;
(2) Consistent with rules of procedure adopted and promulgated by the
commission, make determinations related to allocations and distributions of
support from the Nebraska Telecommunications Universal Service Fund for the
deployment project area; and
(3) In coordination with the Federal Communications Commission, and in
consultation with the incumbent carrier and the competitive provider, determine
whether eligible telecommunications carrier and carrier of last resort
obligations corresponding with support from the Nebraska Telecommunications
Universal Service Fund in the deployment project area should be transferred to
the competitive provider.
Sec. 21. Sections 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 13, 14, 15, 16, 18,
20, 23, and 24 of this act become operative three calendar months after the
adjournment of this legislative session. The other sections of this act become
operative on their effective date.
Sec. 22. Original sections 86-111.01 and 86-704, Reissue Revised Statutes
of Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 23. Original sections 75-342, 76-2325.01, 86-124, and 86-1505,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 75-109.01 and 75-311,
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
Sec. 24. The following section is outright repealed: Section 75-148,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska.
Sec. 25. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-8-